Illinois, session 104th, HB1606.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Vehicle Code is amended by 5changing Section 11-506 as follows: 6    (625 ILCS 5/11-506)7    Sec. 11-506. Street racing; aggravated street racing; 8street sideshows.9    (a) No person shall engage in street racing on any street 10or highway of this State.11    (a-5) No person shall engage in a street sideshow on any 12street or highway of this State. 13    (b) No owner of any vehicle shall acquiesce in or permit 14his or her vehicle to be used by another for the purpose of 15street racing or a street sideshow.16    (b-5) A person may not knowingly interfere with or cause 17the movement of traffic to slow or stop for the purpose of 18facilitating street racing or a street sideshow. 19    (b-7) No person shall gather in a public street, 20commercial parking lot, or any other area open to the public 21for the purpose of street racing or a street side show. 22    (c) For the purposes of this Section:23    "Acquiesce" or "permit" means actual knowledge that the   HB1606- 2 -LRB104 08089 LNS 18135 b1motor vehicle was to be used for the purpose of street racing 2or a street sideshow.3    "Motor vehicle stunt" includes, but is not limited to, 4operating a vehicle in a manner that causes the vehicle to 5slide or spin, driving within the proximity of a gathering of 6persons, performing maneuvers to demonstrate the performance 7capability of the motor vehicle, or maneuvering the vehicle in 8an attempt to elicit a reaction from a gathering of persons. 9    "Street racing" means:10        (1) The operation of 2 or more vehicles from a point 11    side by side at accelerating speeds in a competitive 12    attempt to outdistance each other; or13        (2) The operation of one or more vehicles over a 14    common selected course, each starting at the same point, 15    for the purpose of comparing the relative speeds or power 16    of acceleration of such vehicle or vehicles within a 17    certain distance or time limit; or18        (3) The use of one or more vehicles in an attempt to 19    outgain or outdistance another vehicle; or20        (4) The use of one or more vehicles to prevent another 21    vehicle from passing; or22        (5) The use of one or more vehicles to arrive at a 23    given destination ahead of another vehicle or vehicles; or24        (6) The use of one or more vehicles to test the 25    physical stamina or endurance of drivers over 26    long-distance driving routes.  HB1606- 3 -LRB104 08089 LNS 18135 b1    "Street sideshow" means an event in which one or more 2vehicles block or impede traffic on a street or highway, for 3the purpose of performing unauthorized motor vehicle stunts, 4motor vehicle speed contests, or motor vehicle exhibitions of 5speed. 6    (d) Penalties.7        (1) Any person who is convicted of a violation of 8    subsection (a), (a-5), or (b-5), or (b-7) shall be guilty 9    of a Class A misdemeanor for the first offense and shall be 10    subject to a minimum fine of $250 and forfeiture of the 11    vehicle used in violation of this Section. Any person 12    convicted of a violation of subsection (a), (a-5), or 13    (b-5) a second or subsequent time shall be guilty of a 14    Class 4 felony and shall be subject to a minimum fine of 15    $500. The driver's license of any person convicted of 16    subsection (a) shall be revoked in the manner provided by 17    Section 6-205 of this Code.18        (2) Any person who is convicted of a violation of 19    subsection (b) shall be guilty of a Class B misdemeanor. 20    Any person who is convicted of subsection (b) for a second 21    or subsequent time shall be guilty of a Class A 22    misdemeanor.23        (3) Every person convicted of committing a violation 24    of subsection (a) of this Section shall be guilty of 25    aggravated street racing if the person, in committing a 26    violation of subsection (a) was involved in a motor   HB1606- 4 -LRB104 08089 LNS 18135 b1    vehicle crash that resulted in great bodily harm or 2    permanent disability or disfigurement to another, where 3    the violation was a proximate cause of the injury. 4    Aggravated street racing is a Class 4 felony for which the 5    defendant, if sentenced to a term of imprisonment, shall 6    be sentenced to not less than one year nor more than 12 7    years. 8(Source: P.A. 102-733, eff. 1-1-23; 102-982, eff. 7-1-23; 9103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 103-706, eff. 1-1-25.) 10    Section 10. The Criminal Code of 2012 is amended by 11changing Section 36-1 as follows: 12    (720 ILCS 5/36-1)  (from Ch. 38, par. 36-1)13    Sec. 36-1. Property subject to forfeiture. 14    (a) Any vessel or watercraft, vehicle, or aircraft is 15subject to forfeiture under this Article if the vessel or 16watercraft, vehicle, or aircraft is used with the knowledge 17and consent of the owner in the commission of or in the attempt 18to commit as defined in Section 8-4 of this Code: 19        (1) an offense prohibited by Section 9-1 (first degree 20    murder), Section 9-3 (involuntary manslaughter and 21    reckless homicide), Section 10-2 (aggravated kidnaping), 22    Section 11-1.20 (criminal sexual assault), Section 11-1.30 23    (aggravated criminal sexual assault), Section 11-1.40 24    (predatory criminal sexual assault of a child), subsection   HB1606- 5 -LRB104 08089 LNS 18135 b1    (a) of Section 11-1.50 (criminal sexual abuse), subsection 2    (a), (c), or (d) of Section 11-1.60 (aggravated criminal 3    sexual abuse), Section 11-6 (indecent solicitation of a 4    child), Section 11-14.4 (promoting juvenile prostitution 5    except for keeping a place of juvenile prostitution), 6    Section 11-20.1 (child pornography), paragraph (a)(1), 7    (a)(2), (a)(4), (b)(1), (b)(2), (e)(1), (e)(2), (e)(3), 8    (e)(4), (e)(5), (e)(6), or (e)(7) of Section 12-3.05 9    (aggravated battery), Section 12-7.3 (stalking), Section 10    12-7.4 (aggravated stalking), Section 16-1 (theft if the 11    theft is of precious metal or of scrap metal), subdivision 12    (f)(2) or (f)(3) of Section 16-25 (retail theft), Section 13    18-2 (armed robbery), Section 19-1 (burglary), Section 14    19-2 (possession of burglary tools), Section 19-3 15    (residential burglary), Section 20-1 (arson; residential 16    arson; place of worship arson), Section 20-2 (possession 17    of explosives or explosive or incendiary devices), 18    subdivision (a)(6) or (a)(7) of Section 24-1 (unlawful 19    possession of weapons), Section 24-1.2 (aggravated 20    discharge of a firearm), Section 24-1.2-5 (aggravated 21    discharge of a machine gun or a firearm equipped with a 22    device designed or used for silencing the report of a 23    firearm), Section 24-1.5 (reckless discharge of a 24    firearm), Section 28-1 (gambling), or Section 29D-15.2 25    (possession of a deadly substance) of this Code;26        (2) an offense prohibited by Section 21, 22, 23, 24 or   HB1606- 6 -LRB104 08089 LNS 18135 b1    26 of the Cigarette Tax Act if the vessel or watercraft, 2    vehicle, or aircraft contains more than 10 cartons of such 3    cigarettes;4        (3) an offense prohibited by Section 28, 29, or 30 of 5    the Cigarette Use Tax Act if the vessel or watercraft, 6    vehicle, or aircraft contains more than 10 cartons of such 7    cigarettes;8        (4) an offense prohibited by Section 44 of the 9    Environmental Protection Act;10        (5) an offense prohibited by Section 11-204.1 of the 11    Illinois Vehicle Code (aggravated fleeing or attempting to 12    elude a peace officer);13        (6) an offense prohibited by Section 11-501 of the 14    Illinois Vehicle Code (driving while under the influence 15    of alcohol or other drug or drugs, intoxicating compound 16    or compounds or any combination thereof) or a similar 17    provision of a local ordinance, and:18            (A) during a period in which his or her driving 19        privileges are revoked or suspended if the revocation 20        or suspension was for:21                (i) Section 11-501 (driving under the 22            influence of alcohol or other drug or drugs, 23            intoxicating compound or compounds or any 24            combination thereof), 25                (ii) Section 11-501.1 (statutory summary 26            suspension or revocation),  HB1606- 7 -LRB104 08089 LNS 18135 b1                (iii) paragraph (b) of Section 11-401 (motor 2            vehicle crashes involving death or personal 3            injuries), or4                (iv) reckless homicide as defined in Section 5            9-3 of this Code;6            (B) has been previously convicted of reckless 7        homicide or a similar provision of a law of another 8        state relating to reckless homicide in which the 9        person was determined to have been under the influence 10        of alcohol, other drug or drugs, or intoxicating 11        compound or compounds as an element of the offense or 12        the person has previously been convicted of committing 13        a violation of driving under the influence of alcohol 14        or other drug or drugs, intoxicating compound or 15        compounds or any combination thereof and was involved 16        in a motor vehicle crash that resulted in death, great 17        bodily harm, or permanent disability or disfigurement 18        to another, when the violation was a proximate cause 19        of the death or injuries;20            (C) the person committed a violation of driving 21        under the influence of alcohol or other drug or drugs, 22        intoxicating compound or compounds or any combination 23        thereof under Section 11-501 of the Illinois Vehicle 24        Code or a similar provision for the third or 25        subsequent time;26            (D) he or she did not possess a valid driver's   HB1606- 8 -LRB104 08089 LNS 18135 b1        license or permit or a valid restricted driving permit 2        or a valid judicial driving permit or a valid 3        monitoring device driving permit; or4            (E) he or she knew or should have known that the 5        vehicle he or she was driving was not covered by a 6        liability insurance policy;7        (7) an offense described in subsection (g) of Section 8    6-303 of the Illinois Vehicle Code;9        (8) an offense described in subsection (e) of Section 10    6-101 of the Illinois Vehicle Code; or11        (9)(A) operating a watercraft under the influence of 12    alcohol, other drug or drugs, intoxicating compound or 13    compounds, or combination thereof under Section 5-16 of 14    the Boat Registration and Safety Act during a period in 15    which his or her privileges to operate a watercraft are 16    revoked or suspended and the revocation or suspension was 17    for operating a watercraft under the influence of alcohol, 18    other drug or drugs, intoxicating compound or compounds, 19    or combination thereof; (B) operating a watercraft under 20    the influence of alcohol, other drug or drugs, 21    intoxicating compound or compounds, or combination thereof 22    and has been previously convicted of reckless homicide or 23    a similar provision of a law in another state relating to 24    reckless homicide in which the person was determined to 25    have been under the influence of alcohol, other drug or 26    drugs, intoxicating compound or compounds, or combination   HB1606- 9 -LRB104 08089 LNS 18135 b1    thereof as an element of the offense or the person has 2    previously been convicted of committing a violation of 3    operating a watercraft under the influence of alcohol, 4    other drug or drugs, intoxicating compound or compounds, 5    or combination thereof and was involved in an accident 6    that resulted in death, great bodily harm, or permanent 7    disability or disfigurement to another, when the violation 8    was a proximate cause of the death or injuries; or (C) the 9    person committed a violation of operating a watercraft 10    under the influence of alcohol, other drug or drugs, 11    intoxicating compound or compounds, or combination thereof 12    under Section 5-16 of the Boat Registration and Safety Act 13    or a similar provision for the third or subsequent time; 14    or .15        (10) an offense described in Section 11-506 of the 16    Illinois Vehicle Code. 17    (b) In addition, any mobile or portable equipment used in 18the commission of an act which is in violation of Section 7g of 19the Metropolitan Water Reclamation District Act shall be 20subject to seizure and forfeiture under the same procedures 21provided in this Article for the seizure and forfeiture of 22vessels or watercraft, vehicles, and aircraft, and any such 23equipment shall be deemed a vessel or watercraft, vehicle, or 24aircraft for purposes of this Article.25    (c) In addition, when a person discharges a firearm at 26another individual from a vehicle with the knowledge and   HB1606- 10 -LRB104 08089 LNS 18135 b1consent of the owner of the vehicle and with the intent to 2cause death or great bodily harm to that individual and as a 3result causes death or great bodily harm to that individual, 4the vehicle shall be subject to seizure and forfeiture under 5the same procedures provided in this Article for the seizure 6and forfeiture of vehicles used in violations of clauses (1), 7(2), (3), or (4) of subsection (a) of this Section.8    (d) If the spouse of the owner of a vehicle seized for an 9offense described in subsection (g) of Section 6-303 of the 10Illinois Vehicle Code, a violation of subdivision (d)(1)(A), 11(d)(1)(D), (d)(1)(G), (d)(1)(H), or (d)(1)(I) of Section 1211-501 of the Illinois Vehicle Code, or Section 9-3 of this 13Code makes a showing that the seized vehicle is the only source 14of transportation and it is determined that the financial 15hardship to the family as a result of the seizure outweighs the 16benefit to the State from the seizure, the vehicle may be 17forfeited to the spouse or family member and the title to the 18vehicle shall be transferred to the spouse or family member 19who is properly licensed and who requires the use of the 20vehicle for employment or family transportation purposes. A 21written declaration of forfeiture of a vehicle under this 22Section shall be sufficient cause for the title to be 23transferred to the spouse or family member. The provisions of 24this paragraph shall apply only to one forfeiture per vehicle. 25If the vehicle is the subject of a subsequent forfeiture 26proceeding by virtue of a subsequent conviction of either   HB1606- 11 -LRB104 08089 LNS 18135 b1spouse or the family member, the spouse or family member to 2whom the vehicle was forfeited under the first forfeiture 3proceeding may not utilize the provisions of this paragraph in 4another forfeiture proceeding. If the owner of the vehicle 5seized owns more than one vehicle, the procedure set out in 6this paragraph may be used for only one vehicle.7    (e) In addition, property subject to forfeiture under 8Section 40 of the Illinois Streetgang Terrorism Omnibus 9Prevention Act may be seized and forfeited under this Article.10(Source: P.A. 102-982, eff. 7-1-23; 103-822, eff. 1-1-25.)